Utah statutes.
56-1-19.   Right to eject passenger.
If any passenger refuses to pay his fare or exhibit or surrender his ticket
when requested so to do, or if he behaves in a disorderly manner, the
conductor and employees of a railroad company may, on stopping the train, put
him and his baggage out of the cars, using no unnecessary force, at any usual
stopping place or in sight of a dwelling.
